Hawaii statutes.
§514A-14 Parking stalls.
Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration, apartment owners shall have
the right to change the designation of parking stalls which are appurtenant to
their respective apartments by amendment of the declaration and respective
apartment leases or deeds involved. The amendment need only be signed and
approved by the lessor (in the case of a leasehold project) and the owners (and
their respective mortgagees if any) of the apartments whose parking stalls are
being changed. The amendment shall be effective only upon recording or filing
of the same of record with the bureau of conveyances. [L 1977, c 98, pt of §2;
am L 1983, c 137, §1(1)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next